Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 268 Drainage and Reclamation Act of 1918
268.360.
Copies of assessment record filed with clerk — Clerk’s notice — Determination of objection — Final order.

As soon as the drainage assessment record is completed, the board shall deliver the copies to and file them with the county clerk in which county the district is organized. The clerk shall receive them, and, beginning within five (5) days, publish notice of such filing pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

If objections are filed, they shall be determined by the county judge/executive in a summary way. If errors are found, they shall be by proper orders corrected. The order of the county judge/executive shall direct the clerk to show such corrections on all the copies of the assessment record in red ink. When all errors in the assessment are ordered corrected by the county judge/executive, he shall approve the assessment record.

The final order of approval and confirmation by the county judge/executive shall be final and conclusive upon all property within the district. The assessment record, when corrected by the clerk under orders of the county judge/executive, shall be endorsed by the county judge/executive as the assessment record of the district, and thereafter no question may be raised concerning the correctness of any assessment shown in the record.

One (1) of the several copies of the assessment record, properly corrected and endorsed by the county judge/executive, shall remain in the office of the county clerk. The remaining copies shall be certified and delivered by the clerk to the secretary of the board of the county in which the district was organized.

“State of Kentucky. “County of “In the matter of the (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) district. Notice is hereby given to all persons interested that the board of drainage commissioners of County did on the day of , 19, file in my office copies of the drainage assessment record for the above district in which they show the aggregate costs of the improvements to be made according to the plan for reclamation, also the aggregate of all benefits to property and the minimum district assessment and the apportionment thereof to each piece of property, together with the total of such assessments which are to be paid for each separate piece of property. “All persons interested are hereby notified that they may inspect this record at any time, and are given until to file written objections to these final assessments. “Unless you file objections thereto by that date, it will be taken for granted that the assessments are correct, and correctly apportioned to each separate piece of property, and they will be confirmed, and become the fixed assessments upon each piece of property. “Given under my hand as county clerk on this the day of , 19 Clerk.”

Click to view

History.

2380b-23: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 193; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 244, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, §§ 110, 415, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two sections of Acts 1978, ch. 384, which do not appear to be in conflict and which have been compiled together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Drainage, Reclamation, and Sewer Districts, § 338.00.

268.370.
Board may issue bonds — Terms — Use of proceeds — Duties of treasurer — Bond — Duties of county clerk — Warrants for payment.

The board of drainage commissioners may, if in their judgment it seems best, issue bonds on behalf of any district under their control, not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total amount of the minimum district assessments levied upon the property of the district approved by the county judge/executive. The bonds shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), bearing interest payable at least annually from the date of issue, to mature at annual or more frequent intervals within thirty (30) years, commencing after a period of years not later than five (5) years, to be determined by the board. Both principal and interest shall be payable at some convenient bank or trust company’s office, to be named in the bonds. The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board, attested with the seal of the board, and the signature of the secretary and countersigned by the county clerk of the county in which the district is organized. All bonds shall be executed and delivered to the treasurer of the district, who shall sell them in quantities and at dates as the board considers necessary. The funds derived from the sale of bonds shall be used only to pay the cost of improvements and the expenses, fees, and salaries authorized by law. The secretary of the board shall certify to the county clerk in which the district was organized a copy of the resolution authorizing and directing the issuance of the bonds, which shall contain a list of the bonds, their dates of maturity, and amounts. The clerk shall record this resolution in the lis pendens record in his office. The bonds shall show on their face the purpose for which they are issued.

The bonds shall be payable out of money derived from the assessments upon property, and a sufficient amount of the drainage assessment shall be appropriated by the board to pay the principal and interest. This sum shall be preserved in a separate fund for that purpose. All bonds and coupons not paid at maturity shall bear interest from maturity until paid, or until sufficient funds for their payment have been deposited at the place of payment, and this interest shall be appropriated by the board out of the penalties and interest collected on assessments or any other available funds of the district. The board, in making the annual levy of assessments, shall take into account the maturing bonds and interest on all bonds and make ample provisions in advance for their payment. If the proceeds of the original levy of assessments are not sufficient to pay the principal and interest of all bonds issued, the board shall make any additional levy upon benefits assessed necessary for this purpose. However, no levy of assessments shall be made in excess of the benefits to the property as shown by the report of the appraisers, as corrected, that will in any manner impair the security of bonds or the fund available for the payment of the principal or interest.

When he receives the bonds the treasurer shall execute and deliver to the president of the board a bond with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, conditioned that he shall account for and pay over as required by law and as ordered to do by the board all money received by him on the sale of any bonds, and that he will only sell and deliver the bonds to the purchaser of the bonds according to the terms of this section, and that he will return, duly canceled, any bonds not sold to the board when ordered by it to do so. This bond shall remain in the custody of the president of the board, who shall produce it for inspection or as evidence whenever legally required to do so. The bond of the treasurer may, if the board directs, be signed by a surety or bonding company, which may be approved by the board. The successor in office of any treasurer shall comply with all provisions applicable to his predecessor before receiving bonds or their proceeds. The treasurer shall promptly report all sales of bonds to the board.

The board shall, at reasonable times, prepare and issue warrants for the payment of the maturing bonds sold and the interest payments coming due on all bonds sold. Each warrant shall specify what bonds and accruing interest it is to pay, and the treasurer shall place sufficient funds at the place of payment to pay the maturing bonds and coupons when due, as well as a reasonable compensation to the bank or trust company for paying them, not to exceed two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) par value of bonds or coupons paid.

History.

2380b-42: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 245, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, §§ 416, 578, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 274, § 60, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two sections of Acts 1978, ch. 384, which do not appear to be in conflict and which have been compiled together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Refunding drainage bonds, KRS

269.010

to

269.060

.

268.380.
Cost of improvements not to include interest charges — Assessed enhanced value conclusive as to benefits.

If bonds are issued or money borrowed, the interest charges thereon shall not be considered a part of the cost of improvement in determining whether or not the cost of improvement is equal to or more than the benefit to the property in the district.

The assessed enhancement of value shall be conclusive as to the benefit that will inure to the property in the district.

History.

2380b-24: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 246, effective January 2, 1978.

268.390.
Seal of board on assessment record — Notice and payment of assessments — Determination as to bond issue.

When the secretary of the board receives from the clerk the copies of the assessment record, corrected by the county judge/executive and certified by the clerk, he shall notify the board which shall then meet and impress its seal on each page of each copy of the assessment record.

The secretary shall then give notice that the corrected assessment record is in his hands, and that all persons whose property has been assessed may by a day certain to be stated in the notice, which shall be not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days, pay to the treasurer of the board the minimum assessment levied against his property and have the lien upon the property released. Any person, on or before the day fixed in the notice, may pay to the treasurer the minimum assessment against any property, and take his receipt therefor showing the amount paid. A canceled check shall be the equivalent of a receipt. The treasurer shall indorse below the notation of that assessment on each copy of the assessment record in his hands in red ink the words “paid in full by . . . . . ,” giving the date, and sign his name.

Immediately after the date fixed in the notice on which payments of assessments may be made, the board shall meet and adopt a resolution which shall be spread upon the records of the board, stating the total amount of bonds to be issued for the district and fixing the number of series, the time of payment of each series and the denominations.

History.

2380b-25: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 247, effective January 2, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978.

268.400.
District assessment register — Preparation by secretary — Sheriff receipts register — Copies to counties in district.

As soon as the board has adopted the resolution relative to the issue of bonds, the secretary shall prepare a district assessment register in a well-bound book and as many copies thereof as there are counties in which any part of the district is located. This register shall contain the name of the owner of each piece of property found in the report of the appraisers in the assessment of benefits, a description of the property assessed, as modified, the minimum district assessment, the interest district assessment and the annual installment to be paid each year for the time the bonds are to run, except when the minimum district assessment has been previously paid.

The district assessment register shall be in substantially the following form:

Each assessment shall be on a separate sheet, and there shall be as many spaces prepared for the sheriff to sign as there are annual payments to be made. Each sheet shall be signed by the president and attested by the secretary, and the official seal of the board shall be attached at the bottom of each page. When the sheriff collects any annual installment of the assessment he shall give the payer a receipt and indorse it paid on the blank space on the assessment sheet.

When the district assessment register has been completed the secretary shall deliver a copy to the county clerk in each county where any part of the district is located and take his receipt therefor. The clerk shall file and keep it in his office as a permanent record.

“The district assessment register of district, in the County (Counties) of , Kentucky. Whereas the district, located in the County (Counties) of in the state of Kentucky, was duly established by the orders of the County, and thereafter the plan for reclamation of the district and the report of the appraisers, containing the assessment of benefits and damages, were approved, and the proceedings referred to the board of County, to cause such improvements to be made, and to levy an assessment upon the property in that district to pay for them, to issue bonds and cause the assessment to be collected, and whereas said board after ascertaining the cost of the improvements, did levy a district minimum assessment and a district interest assessment, and apportion them to the property in the district according to the ratio of benefits, which was also corrected and approved, the board now certifies that the following is a true and correct table of assessments so levied upon, and to be paid on each piece of property, together with the annual installments thereof, which shall become due and payable at the same time and place, and collectible by the same person and in the same manner that state and county taxes are payable and collected. This district assessment register is the authority of the tax collector of each county in which any part of the district is located for demanding and collecting the assessments. Name of owner Post office address Description of property assessed Description In what county located No. of acres Amount of assessed benefits $ Total amount of minimum district assessment $ Total maximum assessment $ Amount to be collected for the year 19 19, $, Paid by Collector. Amount to be collected for the year 19 19, $, Paid by Collector. Amount to be collected for the year 19 19, $, Paid by Collector. The collector of taxes in the County of is hereby ordered to collect the above assessment and pay same to the treasurer at the time required by law each year. Done by order of the board of drainage commissioners of County, Kentucky, on this the day of , 19 Attest: Secretary President (Seal)”

Click to view

History.

2380b-26: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 248, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Drainage, Reclamation, and Sewer Districts, § 338.00.

268.410.
Board certifies to sheriff amount of installment due — Form of certificate — Collector’s drainage assessment book.

In December of each year the board shall certify to the sheriff of each county in which any part of the district is located the annual installment of the assessments to become due and be collected during the succeeding year. This installment shall be collected at the same time as state and county taxes.

The certificate of the installment of assessment shall be in substantially the following form:

A table or schedule shall follow, showing in properly ruled columns: First, the names of the owners as they appeared in the district assessment register; second, a brief description of the property opposite the names of the owners; third, the amount of the annual installment of assessment on each piece of property; fourth, the amount of maintenance assessment; fifth, a blank column in which the collector shall record the amounts collected by him; sixth, a blank column in which the collector shall record the date of payment of each sum; seventh, a blank column in which the collector shall record the name of the person paying each sum. The columns in which the annual installment and the maintenance assessment appear shall be totaled. The total amount shall correspond to the amount set out in the certificate.

The certificate and table shall be prepared in the form of a well-bound book, indorsed and named “Collector’s drainage assessment book, drainage district No. _________ of _____________________________________ County (Counties), Kentucky, for the year 19 _________ ” This indorsement shall also be printed on the top of each page. At the end of the table of assessments shall be these words:

“Commonwealth of Kentucky. County of To the sheriff of County: “This is to certify that the board of drainage commissioners of County, Kentucky, on behalf of drainage district No. of County (Counties), Kentucky, has levied the sum of $ as the annual installment of assessments for the year 19 , of the total assessment levied and certified to the county clerk of your county. The board, on behalf of the drainage district, also levies $ as a maintenance assessment for that year, both of which are set out in the following table, in which are: First, the names of the owners of property as they appear on the district assessment register; second, the amount of the installment of the assessment levied on that property due and collectible for the year 19, third, the amount of maintenance assessment levied against it. The assessment shall be payable at the same time as state and county taxes and you are ordered to demand and collect the assessments at the same time you demand and collect the state and county taxes due on the same property. This certificate shall be your warrant and authority for making such demand and collection.”

Click to view

“Done by order of the board of drainage commissioners of County on this day of , 19 Attest: Secretary President (Seal)”

Click to view

History.

2380b-28: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 417, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Drainage, Reclamation, and Sewer Districts, § 338.00.

268.420.
Collection of assessments by sheriff — Fee — Returns to treasurer — Delinquency penalty — Sale of assessment lien claims.

The sheriff of each county of the district shall receive the collector’s drainage assessment book each year. He shall promptly and faithfully demand and collect the assessments at the same time that he demands and collects the state and county taxes due on the same property. If any property has been divided or transferred, the sheriff shall receive payment of assessments on any part charged with the assessments and give his receipt accordingly, and show therein upon what part of the property the assessment has been paid. The collector’s drainage assessment book shall be the warrant and authority of the sheriff for making demand and collection of drainage assessments. The fee of the sheriff for collecting drainage assessments shall be four percent (4%), which shall be added to the regular assessment. The sheriff shall return all collector’s drainage assessment books each year to the secretary of the board, and shall pay over and account to the treasurer of the district for all money collected thereon each year at the same time he pays over state and county taxes.

If the assessment has not been paid to the sheriff or collector on any parcel of land or property described in the assessment register certified to him during the year for which said assessment was levied or on or before the last day of February of the year immediately following the year for which said assessment was levied and became due, a penalty of six percent (6%) shall automatically attach thereto on and after said date, which shall be added to the assessment against such parcel or parcels of land on which the assessment has not been paid, to be collected in the same manner that the assessment is collected; and unless so paid the sheriff or collector shall advertise and offer for sale the assessment lien claim of said district in the same manner as state and county tax claims are required to be sold, which sale shall be for the assessments, penalties, costs and expenses of making sale in the same manner and with the same force and effect as sales of tax claims for state and county taxes, and subject to redemption by the owner within the time, on the terms, upon the penalties and upon the same conditions that are now and may hereafter be provided by general law for the redemption of land or other property sold by the sheriff for state or county taxes.

When an assessment lien claim is sold for the assessment herein provided for, if no one will bid for and purchase and pay for such claim so offered for sale, the amount of the assessment, penalty, interest and costs, including the costs for advertising such sale, it shall be the duty of the sheriff making such sale to purchase same for the board of drainage commissioners to which such assessment is due and owing, and he shall make report of such fact to the county clerk of the county in which such land or property is located, as required by law under sales to the state and county for state and county taxes. He shall also certify such facts in like manner to the secretary of the board of drainage commissioners, which report shall be received and kept by the secretary of such board and recorded by him in the general drainage record book kept by him.

The purchaser of any such lands pursuant to a proceeding in enforcement of said assessment lien claim shall take said property subject to the future assessments to be levied against said property for making the improvement, including all such assessments becoming delinquent after the sale of the assessment lien claim thus enforced. The purchaser of such assessment lien claims shall have the same estate, right, title, and interest in the delinquent property that purchasers of certificates of delinquency acquire at sales of tax claims for state and county taxes, subject alone to the provisions of this section.

History.

2380b-28a, 2380b-30: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 158; 1944, ch. 165; 1978, ch. 384, § 418, effective June 17, 1978.

268.430.
Treasurer may receive payment of assessments — Certification of unpaid assessments — Collection not defeated by irregularity.

When ordered by the board the treasurer shall receive the annual payment of drainage assessments directly from any owner, and shall give a proper receipt. On December 1 of each year the treasurer shall certify to the sheriff a list of all property on which drainage assessments for that year have not been paid to the treasurer. Any assessments not paid to the treasurer or sheriff shall be treated by the sheriff as delinquent drainage taxes. This section shall not relieve the board or sheriff of any duty.

No collection of assessments shall be defeated because of any irregularity in the proceedings which did not affect the substantial rights of the party complaining.

History.

2380b-28a, 2380b-56: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 249, effective January 2, 1978.

268.440.
Payment in advance of full assessment levied.

At any time prior to the issuance of the bonds, any person may pay in one lump sum the full amount of the assessment levied against his property, less the amount added thereto to meet interest. The secretary of the board shall then enter upon the district assessment record opposite each tract for which payment is made the words “paid in full” and such assessment shall be deemed satisfied. The secretary shall also make the same entry opposite each tract for which payment is made in the table included in the certificate filed in the office of the county clerk. However, this payment shall not prevent the levying of additional or maintenance assessments against the property.

At any time after the issuance of the bonds, the board may receive from any owner payment in full of the unpaid portion of the minimum district assessment against his property, if arrangements can be made with the bondowners for the surrender and retirement of an amount of bonds, with coupons attached, equal in principal to the amount of the lump payment, and if the transaction will cause no present or future shortage of funds for payment of coupons and the retiring of maturing bonds.

History.

2380b-45, 2380b-45a.

268.450.
Board may defer payment of assessment — Interest installments to cover cost of bonds.

If the board believes the interest and welfare of the owners will be best served by not requiring any part of the minimum district assessment to be collected for not more than five (5) years from the time the minimum and interest assessments are confirmed by the county judge/executive, it shall by resolution fix the time when the first annual assessment shall become payable. However, sufficient annual assessments shall be levied and collected each year till the year the first installment of the minimum and interest assessments are due to pay the interest on the bonds, plus the cost of levying and collecting them. The annual interest installments shall be levied on all property in the exact ratio of the assessments confirmed by the county judge/executive.

History.

2380b-27: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 250, effective January 2, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978.

268.460.
Board may abate change in date of collecting assessment.

If the date of collecting drainage assessments and applying the penalty for delinquency is changed by law after the issuance of any obligations for a district, and interferes with the proper discharge of the obligations, the board may, by written notice to the sheriff, require payment according to the law in effect at the time the obligations were issued. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate the provisions of KRS

268.430

.

History.

2380b-30a.

268.470.
Board may levy maintenance assessment — Terms — Purpose — How recorded — Collection.

To maintain and preserve any improvement and to defray the current expenses of the district, the board may, upon the completion of any improvement and on the first Monday in December in each year thereafter, levy an assessment upon each piece of property within the district, to be known as a maintenance assessment. This maintenance assessment, apportioned upon the basis of benefits assessed on account of original construction, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) thereof in any one (1) year, and shall be certified to the sheriff of each county in which property of the district lies as the annual installment of assessment is certified, and recorded in the same book, but in a separate column under the heading “maintenance assessment.” This assessment shall not in any one (1) year exceed two percent (2%) of the original cost of construction, unless consent is first obtained in writing from the owners of two-thirds (2/3) of the property affected.

The sheriff shall demand and collect the maintenance assessment, make return, receive the same compensation and be liable for the same penalties for failure or neglect as is provided in KRS

268.420

for the annual installments of assessments. The maintenance assessment shall be payable and shall be collected at the same time each year that the other assessments of the district due that year are payable, shall bear the same penalties and shall be enforced in the same manner.

History.

2380b-28a, 2380b-43.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the Spencer County Flood Wall Commission was organized under chapter 268, the provisions in that chapter apply; the Commission must follow the tax collection procedure set out in chapter 268, which precludes the inclusion of the assessment on county property tax bills.

OAG 92-23

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Withdrawal of land from district to avoid maintenance assessments, KRS

269.260

.

268.480.
Owners may maintain improvements — Credit slip for work done — Terms — Use.

Owners in a district may be employed on maintenance work and their work credited against their maintenance assessments, within the discretion of the board or the drainage commissioners. In part or full payment for the work, printed credit slips shall be issued by the president of the board, the drainage commissioner and the treasurer of the district, each slip showing to whom issued, the date and hours of work, whether day labor, teams or otherwise, materials supplied, location of work and any other information the board considers proper. Before becoming valid, the credit slips shall be approved by the board and made a part of its records. Rates of pay shall not be greater than current for similar work in the locality. The work shall be distributed among the landowners as equitably as is economically possible, but economy shall be the first consideration, and only satisfactory workers shall be employed.

At least twenty (20) days before the maintenance assessments are due all credit slips shall be sent to the treasurer and proper deductions made for them from the maintenance assessments. The board shall report to the sheriff the deductions to be made, and a copy of the report shall be retained in the minutes. The board may authorize the treasurer to receive money payments to make up the balance due on maintenance assessments. The sheriff shall collect the remainder of the assessments in the regular way. The board may, at its discretion, permit transfer of credit slips from one (1) owner to another, and the use of credit slips in other than the year in which the work was done. Otherwise the credit slips shall be valid only in the year in which the work is done. Credit slips shall not be used in payment of other than maintenance assessments.

History.

2380b-43a.

268.490.
Lien for assessments — Rank.

All drainage assessments provided for in this chapter together with all penalties for default in payment and all costs of collection shall, from the date of filing the district assessment register in the office of the county clerk until paid, constitute a lien superior to all other liens except the lien for state, county, city, school and road taxes.

History.

2380b-23, 2380b-29.

268.500.
Subsequent owner’s privity — Apportionment of assessment.

Any person who acquires title to any property affected by any proceeding under this chapter, after the filing of the petition for establishment of any district and the giving of notice thereof by the clerk of the court, shall be deemed privy to the person owning or in possession under claim of ownership at the time of filing the petition, and shall be bound by all subsequent proceedings as the owner at that time would have been bound if he had remained owner of the property. The property assessed shall in each instance be liable for the assessment against it, and each installment of any assessment shall be paid by the owner in possession at the time any installment becomes due.

Any land assessed for benefits in which one or more persons own the life estate with the remainder to some other person, shall be assessed as any other land by the appraisers, and the name of the life tenant and the remainderman reported if known, but the remainderman or reversioner need not be brought in the proceedings before his interest becomes vested. The assessment may be paid by either the life tenant or the remainderman, and when so paid the owner not paying shall be liable to the one who pays the assessment for such proportion of the amount paid as his interest in the property bears to the total property assessed according to the life tables at the time in use in this state. The person who pays shall have, for his own benefit, the same lien provided for the original assessment, which may be enforced by action in any court of competent jurisdiction. An owner of any undivided interest in lands may pay the whole assessment and be entitled to like contribution and substitution.

History.

2380b-41, 2380b-52: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 251, effective January 2, 1978.

268.510.
Board may make improvements, control water power — Condemn property.

In order to effect the drainage, protection and reclamation of the land and other property in any district organized under this chapter subject to assessment, to protect cities from overflow, and to promote the public health or general welfare of the community, the board acting for the district may clean out, alter, construct or maintain any drain in or out of the district, and construct and maintain any levees, dikes, dams, revetments, reservoirs, holding basins, floodways, pumping stations, syphons and any other work and improvements deemed necessary to preserve and maintain the works or prevent overflow of land or protect any city or parts thereof in or out of the district. The board may construct or enlarge any bridge needed in or out of the district across any drain or other improvement or any public highway, railroad right-of-way, track, grade, fill or cut, subject to the provisions of KRS

268.530

; construct roadways upon, along and over levees and embankments; remove any fence, building or improvement in or out of the district.

The board may hold, control and acquire by donation or purchase, or, if need be, condemn any land, easement, railroad right-of-way, sluice, conduit, sewer, holding basin or franchise in or out of the district for any purpose provided for in this chapter.

The board may also condemn, pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, for the use of the district any property within or without the district not acquired or condemned by the board on the report of the appraisers.

The board may control all water power created by the construction of improvements in the district, and construct and maintain any hydroelectric power plants to develop such power for the use of the district and use any funds in the treasury of the district not otherwise appropriated for the construction and maintenance of such plants. The board may lease any power in excess of that required for the use of the district. The proceeds of such lease shall be turned in to the treasury of the district.

However, the construction or maintenance of any improvement shall not impair navigation upon any navigable stream in this state.

History.

2380b-2, 2380b-32: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 104; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 252, effective January 2, 1978.

268.515.
Power of condemnation.

Whenever any property is going to be taken or damaged by the board pursuant to this chapter, the board may effect an agreement with the owner for compensation therefor. If no agreement is reached, the board may condemn the property pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 224, effective January 2, 1978.

268.520.
Board may construct or let contract for improvement — Bond — Supervision by chief engineer.

The board may construct any improvement needed to carry out the plan for reclamation. To accomplish that end the board may employ men and teams and lease, rent, hire or purchase machinery, and directly construct any improvement, by the use of other and more efficient means than provided for in the plans adopted.

The board may, in its discretion, let the contract for the improvement, either as a whole or in sections, but before letting any contract the board shall advertise for bids in the manner which it may by resolution determine will be for the best interest of the district. When such contract is let, it shall be let to the lowest and best bidder, who shall give a good approved bond with ample security, conditioned that he will well and promptly carry out the contract to construct the improvement. The contract shall be in writing, and prepared by the attorney for the district. Before the work is commenced it shall be approved by the board and signed by the president and secretary of the board and the contractor, and shall be executed in duplicate. Complete plans and specifications of the work to be done and the improvements to be made under it shall be prepared by the chief engineer, and attached to and made a part of the contract. The board may require a certified check payable to it to accompany any bid, as a guarantee of good faith to be forfeited as liquidated damages upon the failure of the bidder to execute bond with the approved surety if the contract for the work is awarded to such bidder.

The chief engineer shall be the superintendent of all improvements, and shall, whenever required, and at least once each month, make a full written report to the board of all work done and improvements made and any suggestions and recommendations to the board that he deems proper.

History.

2380b-21.

268.530.
Board to build bridges and culverts — May charge cost to corporation acting under franchise or cause corporation to construct.

The board shall make all necessary bridges and culverts along or across any public highway or railroad which may be deemed necessary for the use or the protection of the work of reclamation in the district, except as provided in this section and in KRS

268.550

.

If any bridge or culvert of any railroad or other corporation carrying on its business under a franchise is across any natural watercourse, drain or depression which is being improved by any district, and it is necessary to do any work under that bridge or culvert, or if a wider or larger bridge or culvert is needed there, the board shall give the corporation notice by delivering to its agent or officer in any county where any part of the district is situated a copy of the order of the board declaring the necessity of removing, constructing or enlarging the bridge or culvert.

The corporation shall then remove, construct or enlarge the bridge or culvert within the time specified in the order and notice, which shall be not more than thirty (30) days. The bridge or culvert shall be constructed so as not to interfere with the free flow of water through the drains of the district.

Should any corporation, after first being notified to remove, construct or enlarge any bridge or culvert, refuse or neglect to do so, then the board shall, unless it elects to compel the corporation to do the work as provided in subsection (6) of this section, have the work done. The board shall let the work according to plans and specifications to be provided at the expense of the corporation. The board shall first advertise that the work will be let to the lowest bidder by posting notices at three (3) or more public and conspicuous places in the vicinity where the bridge or culvert is to be removed, built or enlarged, for at least ten (10) days just before the letting of the work. This notice shall state the time, place and character of the work to be done.

If the board has the work done, it shall pay for the removal, construction or enlargement of the bridge or culvert, but shall then recover the cost and expenses in any court having jurisdiction from the corporation whose duty it was to do the work. Both the board and the corporation shall have the same right of appeal from any judgment rendered in any action as provided for individual landowners.

The board’s right to remove, construct or enlarge the bridge or culvert shall not deprive the board from compelling the corporation to do it by proper proceedings. Mandamus may be issued for this purpose.

History.

2380b-35.